Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1612
Political subdivision, defined.

Political subdivision shall include villages, cities, counties, school districts, public power districts, community colleges, natural resources districts, and all other units of local government.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 12.